Utah statutes.
61-2a-6.   Real Estate Division -- Authority to act upon receipt of
petition.
(1)  Upon receipt of a petition as required by Section 61-2a-5, the division
may answer, initiate review proceedings of its own, or appear in any
proceeding in the name of the defendant to the action or on behalf of the
fund.
(2)  The division may, subject to court approval, compromise a claim based
upon the application of a petitioner.
